Georgia, session 2025_26, HB873.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 7 of Chapter 3 of Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
retirement allowances, disability benefits, and spouses' benefits, is amended by revising
subsection (a) of Code Section 47-3-127, relating to effect of restoration to service on
retirement allowances, and creditable service after restoration to service, as follows:
"(a) If, except as provided in Code Section 47-3-127.1 or 47-3-127.2, a beneficiary is
restored to service as a teacher, he or she may elect:
H. B. 873
- 1 -

LC 56 0323
(1) Cessation of his or her retirement allowance, in which case he or she shall again
become a contributing member of the retirement system and be governed by the
retirement provisions of this chapter; or
(2) Not to reinstate his or her membership in the retirement system, in which case his or
her retirement benefits shall be suspended during the period of time he or she is restored
to service. Upon cessation of such service, his or her prior retirement allowance shall be
resumed.
If the returning beneficiary fails to elect either choice, his or her status shall be as if he or
she had elected paragraph (1) of this subsection."
SECTION 2.
Said article is further amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"47-3-127.2.
(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of Code Section 47-3-127, to the extent and under the
conditions provided for in this Code section, the Department of Education may employ a
beneficiary.
(b) An individual employed as described in subsection (a) of this Code section shall
remain a beneficiary and shall continue to receive his or her retirement allowance and any
postretirement benefit adjustments for which he or she is eligible; provided, however, that
such service shall not constitute creditable service and shall not entitle such beneficiary to
a recomputation of retirement benefits upon cessation of such service.
(c) The provisions of this Code section shall not apply to any beneficiary who becomes an
employee of any school operated by the Department of Education.
(d) The provisions of this Code section shall not become part of the employment contract
and shall be subject to future legislation."
H. B. 873
- 2 -

LC 56 0323
SECTION 3.
This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026, only if it is determined to have been
concurrently funded as provided in Chapter 20 of Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia
Annotated, the "Public Retirement Systems Standards Law"; otherwise, this Act shall not
become effective and shall be automatically repealed in its entirety on July 1, 2026, as
required by subsection (a) of Code Section 47-20-50.
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 873
- 3 -